North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12 Corrections, Parole, and Probation
CHAPTER 12-47 The Penitentiary
12-47-36.
Records exempt — Confidential — Exceptions.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The case history records of the department of corrections and rehabilitation or its divisions or departments relating to persons in the custody or under the supervision and management of the division of adult services of the department of corrections and rehabilitation are exempt records as defined in section 44-04-17.1. Upon application to the district court, with service of the application on the department of corrections and rehabilitation and opportunity for the department to submit a written response, the court may order the inspection of a case history record unless there is a showing by the department of corrections and rehabilitation that a proper and legitimate reason exists for denying inspection of the case history record. If the court issues an order allowing inspection, the court shall allow the department of corrections and rehabilitation to remove all identifying information that may create a risk of harm to property or to any person. As used in this section, “case history record” means any record of a person in the custody or under the supervision and management of the division of adult services of the department of corrections and rehabilitation except for medical, psychological, and treatment records and legal files. The term includes inmate disciplinary proceedings, administrative and disciplinary segregation placements, institutional and criminal investigation reports, supervision histories, job placements, education programs, inmate financial accounts under section 12-48-15, and protective management cases.

The medical, psychological, and treatment records of the department of corrections and rehabilitation or its divisions or departments relating to persons in the custody or under the supervision and management of the division of adult services of the department of corrections and rehabilitation are confidential, and may not be disclosed directly or indirectly to any person, organization, or agency, except as otherwise provided in this section. A district court may order the inspection of medical, psychological, and treatment records, or parts of those records, upon application to the court and a showing that there is a proper and legitimate purpose for the inspection of the records, with service of the application on the department of corrections and rehabilitation and opportunity for the department of corrections and rehabilitation to submit a written response.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law relating to privilege or confidentiality, except for the confidentiality requirements of federal drug and alcohol treatment and rehabilitation laws, the following persons, organizations, or agencies without prior application to the court may inspect case history, medical, psychological, or treatment records:

The governor;

The pardon advisory board, if the governor has appointed a pardon advisory board;

The parole board;

Any division, department, official, or employee of the department of corrections and rehabilitation;

Another state receiving a parolee or probationer under the provisions of chapter 12-65;

A federal, state, regional, or county correctional facility receiving physical custody of a person under the legal custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation;

The employees in the office of the attorney general and investigators, consultants, or experts retained by the state;

The risk management division of the office of management and budget for the purpose of investigating and defending actions or claims under chapter 32-12.2;

The district court of the county where the judgment of conviction was entered;

A state or federal court where a person who is or was in the custody or under the supervision and management of the adult services division of the department of corrections and rehabilitation has commenced litigation and, the parties, their counsel, and representatives of the parties in proceedings, if the records are relevant to the litigation and the subject of the records has signed an authorization;

A criminal justice agency as defined in section 44-04-18.7;

The United States social security administration and veterans administration; or

A state, federal, or tribal agency that evaluates sex offenders for civil commitment or assesses sex offender risk level for registration.

Records with respect to the person’s identity, location, legal files except records under court seal, criminal convictions, or projected date of release, except for the records of a person who is under protective management, are open records.

Medical, psychological, or treatment records may be disclosed without prior application to the court to a public hospital or treatment facility, the department of health and human services, a community behavioral health program, a vocational rehabilitation program, a transitional living facility, or a licensed private medical or treatment facility, when necessary for the evaluation, treatment, or care of a person who is or who has been in the custody of, or is or who has been under the supervision and management of, the adult services division of the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

A criminal defendant’s presentence investigation report, together with any attachment or addendum, is subject to rule 32 of the North Dakota Rules of Criminal Procedure and any amendments made thereto.

The parole board may permit the inspection of a person’s preparole report, or parts of the report, prepared for the parole board.

Any person, organization, or agency receiving exempt or confidential records under this section shall maintain the closed or confidential nature of the records and may not redisclose the records.

The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall maintain the confidentiality of witness protection program records and legal files under seal.

The medical, psychological, and treatment records of the department relating to persons in the custody or under the supervision and management of the division of adult services of the department of corrections and rehabilitation may be disclosed for the purpose of conducting research and educational activities. A person conducting research or educational activities may not redisclose identifying information received under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 158, § 1; 1993, ch. 114, § 2; 1997, ch. 114, § 5; 2001, ch. 127, § 1; 2003, ch. 102, § 1; 2009, ch. 118, § 3; 2019, ch. 15, § 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 94, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 16, effective September 1, 2022.

12-47-37.
Transporting of prisoners.

A prisoner who has been charged with, pled guilty to, or been convicted of a class A or class AA felony in this state may not be transported except by employees of the department of corrections and rehabilitation or by law enforcement officers or correctional officers employed by a governmental agency. For purposes of this section, “governmental agency” means an agency or department of this state or of any political subdivision of this state, of another state or of a political subdivision of another state, or of the United States.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 128, § 1.

12-47-38.
Director to contract for housing female inmates. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 118, § 4.

12-47-39.
Definitions — Health care for chronically or terminally ill offenders — Notice to health care facility.

As used in this section:

“Chronically ill” has the same meaning as in section 26.1-33.2-01.

“Department” means the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

“Health care facility” means an assisted living facility as defined in section 23-09-01, a basic care facility as defined in section 23-09.3-01, or a nursing home as defined in section 23-30-01, except that transitional care units and other long-term care beds owned or operated on the premises of acute care hospitals or critical care hospitals are not health care facilities for the purpose of this section.

“Terminally ill” has the same meaning as in section 26.1-33.2-01.

If an offender is to be given an early release, pardon, or parole due to a chronic or terminal illness for admission as a resident of a health care facility due to the chronic or terminal illness, the department shall provide prior written notice to the administrator of the facility, stating:

The offense for which the offender was convicted and a description of the actual offense;

The offender’s status with the department;

That the information provided by the department regarding the offender may be provided to residents and employees of the facility by the administrator of the facility;

The offender’s health status and type of health care the offender requires;

Any available risk assessment information regarding the offender’s likelihood of reoffending; and

The name of the party responsible for the payment for the services provided by the health care facility to the offender.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 113, § 1.